Hawaii statutes.
[§194-7 Rules.] The invasive species
council may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, to effectuate this [chapter]. [L
2003, c 85, §8; am L 2004, c 10, §16; am L 2006, c 109, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next